Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-382
Nonresident owners; thirty-day license plate; application; fee;
certificate; contents.

(1) Any person, not a resident of
this state, who is the owner of a motor vehicle or trailer required to be
registered in this state or any other state may, for the sole purpose of delivering,
or having delivered, such motor vehicle or trailer, to his or her home or
place of business in another state, apply for and obtain a thirty-day license
plate which shall allow such person or his or her agent or employee to operate
such motor vehicle or trailer upon the highways under conditions set forth
in subsection (2) of this section, without obtaining a certificate of title
to such motor vehicle in this state.

(2) Applications for such thirty-day license plate shall be made to
the county treasurer of the county where such motor vehicle or trailer
was purchased or acquired. Upon receipt of such application and payment of
the fee of five dollars, the county treasurer shall issue to
such applicant a thirty-day license plate, which shall be devised by the director,
and evidenced by the official certificate of the county treasurer, which certificate
shall state the name of the owner and operator of the motor vehicle or trailer
so licensed, the description of such motor vehicle or trailer, the place in
Nebraska where such motor vehicle or trailer was purchased or otherwise acquired,
the place where delivery is to be made, and the time, not to exceed thirty
days from date of purchase or acquisition of the motor vehicle or trailer,
during which time such license plate shall be valid.

(3) Nonresident owner thirty-day license plates issued under this section
shall be the same size and of the same basic design as regular license plates
issued pursuant to section 60-3,100.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 82;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 55.